Missouri, session 2026, SB1399.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 288, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
two new sections, to be known as sections 288.135 and 288.136,
to read as follows:
288.135. 1. This is hereby created in the state
treasury the "Unemployment Administration Adjustment Fund",
which shall consist of money collected pursuant to section
288.136, and such other state funds appropriated by the
general assembly. The state treasurer shall be custodian of
the fund and may approve disbursements from the fund in
accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180. Upon
appropriation, money in the fund shall be used solely for
the purpose of defraying the cost of the administration of
this law, and for no other purpose whatsoever.
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the
contrary, all moneys remaining in the fund at the end of the
biennium shall not revert to the credit of the general
revenue fund. The state treasurer shall invest moneys in
the fund in the same manner as other funds are invested.
Any interest and money earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.

SB 1399 2
2. The unemployment administration adjustment fund
shall not be used in whole or in part for any purpose or in
any manner that would permit its substitution for, or a
corresponding reduction in, federal funds that would be
available in its absence to finance expenditures for the
administration of this chapter, or cause the appropriate
agency of the United States government to withhold any part
of an administrative grant which would otherwise be made.
288.136. 1. Each employer liable for contributions
pursuant to this chapter, except employers with a
contribution rate equal to zero, shall pay an annual
unemployment administration adjustment in an amount equal to
five one-hundredths of one percent of such employer's total
taxable wages for the twelve-month period ending the
preceding June thirtieth.
2. Notwithstanding subsection 1 of this section to the
contrary, when the September thirtieth balance of the
unemployment administration adjustment fund is forty million
dollars or more, or if the average balance of the
unemployment compensation trust fund of the four preceding
quarters (September thirtieth, June thirtieth, March thirty-
first, December thirty-first) is less than four hundred
fifty million dollars, no unemployment administration
adjustment shall be applied in the succeeding calendar year.
3. Each employer liable to pay an unemployment
administration adjustment shall be notified of the amount
due under this section by March thirty-first of each year
and such amount shall be considered delinquent thirty days
thereafter. Delinquent unemployment administration
adjustment amounts may be collected in the manner provided
under sections 288.160 and 288.170. All moneys collected
under this section shall be deposited in the unemployment

SB 1399 3
administration adjustment fund established in section
288.135.
4. For the first quarter of each calendar year, the
total amount of contribution otherwise due from each
employer liable to pay contributions under this chapter
shall be reduced by the dollar amount due from such employer
pursuant to the calculation in subsection 1 of this
section. However, the amount of contributions due from such
employer for the first quarter of the calendar year in
question shall not be reduced below zero.
✓